Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Chapter 5
PROTECTION OF PERSONS UNDER DISABILITY AND THEIR PROPERTY

Part 1. General Provisions

Sec.

Part 2. Guardians of Minors

15-5-212A. Guardianships arising in connection with a proceeding under the child protective act.

Part 3. Guardians of Incapacitated Persons

Part 4. Protection of Property of
Persons Under Disability
and Minors

15-5-407A. Temporary and emergency appointments.

15-5-409a. Compromise of claim of minor — Procedure.

Part 5. Powers of Attorney

Part 6. Boards of Community Guardian